Washington statutes.
RCW 36.96.090

New special purpose districts—Duties of county auditor.

For every newly created special purpose district, the auditor of each county in which the special purpose district is located shall provide the state auditor with the following information:

(1) The name of the special purpose district and a general description of its location;

(2) The name, address, and telephone number of each member of its governing authority; and

(3) The functions that the special purpose district is then presently performing and the purposes for which it was created.

[ 2009 c 337 s 13; 1979 ex.s. c 5 s 9.]